src/fst/morphology/ext-TRmorph/morph.lexc
LEXICON OptPAgrCont
                        ENDLEX;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      OptPagrQCont;

LEXICON OptPagrQCont
                        ENDLEX;
                        PAgrCplEvid2;
                        PAgrCplPast2;

!
! Imperative
!

LEXICON TAMImpCont
                        PAgrIMPEnd;

LEXICON PAgrIMPEnd
%<2s%>:0@MB             ENDLEX;
%<2s%:sAnA%>:s^An^NS^A@MB     ENDLEX;
%<2s%:yIn%>:^(y)^In@MB       ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:s^NS^In@MB       ENDLEX;
%<2p%:yIn%>:^(y)^In@MB       ENDLEX;
%<2p%:yInIz%>:^(y)^NS^In^Iz@MB ENDLEX;
%<2p%:sAnIz%>:s^An^NS^Iz^A@MB  ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:s^Inl^Ar@MB      ENDLEX;

!
! Person agreement markers, final state.
!
LEXICON PAgrG1End
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB  ENDLEX;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB     ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:0@MB        ENDLEX;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB  ENDLEX;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB  ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB     ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrG2End
%<1s%>:m@MB         ENDLEX;
%<2s%>:n@MB         ENDLEX;
%<3s%>:0@MB         ENDLEX;
%<1p%>:k@MB         ENDLEX;
%<2p%>:n^Iz@MB      ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      ENDLEX;


!
! i- is a bound (verbal) root that combines with copular markers.
!

LEXICON V_i
%<V%>:@RB         iCont;

LEXICON iCont
            CplAll;


!
! -mI is the question particle. In its main use, we mark it as <Q>.
! For other uses we also analyze it as an adverb (when used for 
! emphasizing: 'güzel mi güzel bir kız') or subordinating conjunction
! for the cases where it is used as such (Eve vardınız mı bana
! telefon edin')
!

LEXICON mI
%<Q%>:@RB             mICont;
%<Cnj%:sub%>:@RB      ENDLEX;
%<Adv%>:@RB           ENDLEX;

LEXICON mICont
                        ENDLEX; ! we have person marker before.   
%<cpl%:pres%>:0         mIPagr; ! in case predicate is not marked for tense
                        mIPagr;
                        mIDI;
                        mIMIS;
                        mIDIr;

LEXICON mIPagr
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB      mIPagrCont;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB         mIPagrCont;
%<3s%>:0@MB            mIPagrCont;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB      mIPagrCont;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB      mIPagrCont;

LEXICON  mIPagrCont
                        ENDLEX;
                        DIrEnd;
LEXICON mIDI
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB  PAgrG2End;

LEXICON mIMIS
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB PAgrG1End;

LEXICON mIDIr
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB        mIDIrCont;

LEXICON  mIDIrCont
                        ENDLEX;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB          ENDLEX;

! Copular marker combinations
!
! this is for simplifying the copula replication above.
!
! the description below may be a bit too permissive

! here we do not have any agreement markers yet
!
LEXICON CplAll
    CplEvid;
    CplPast;
    CplCond;
    CplKen;
    lArCplKen; ! this is a trick to analyze words like 'yürürlerken'
               ! or 'evdelerken'. It seems if person in question is
               ! <3p>, then it can be added, but other cases take null
               ! agreement. We only mark <3p>, if there is -lAr.
               ! Otherwise it can agree with any person, but we do not 
               ! mark it.
               !
               ! TODO: this may not be the best decision.

LEXICON CplEvid
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     CplEvidCont;

LEXICON CplEvidCont
                PAgrG1End;
                CplPAgrG1; ! this is marked/rare usage - gidiyormuşumsa
                CplCond2;
                CplEvid2;
                CplPast2;
                CVcesinePagr;
! TODO: In a relatively rare number of cases -DIr may follow if -(I)yor 
!       precedes the evidential copula.

LEXICON CplEvid2
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     PAgrG1End;
    
LEXICON CplPast2
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      PAgrG2End;

LEXICON CplCond2
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       PAgrG2End;

LEXICON CplCond
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       CplCondCont;

LEXICON  CplCondCont
                            PAgrG2End;
                            CplEvid2;
                            CplPast2;

LEXICON  CplPast
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      CplPastCont;

LEXICON CplPastCont
                PAgrG2End;
                CplCond2;
                CplPAgrG2; ! this is marked/rare usage - gidiyordumsa
                CplPast2; ! this is also borderline case: 'yapacaktıydı'

LEXICON CplPAgrG1
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB  CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB     CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<3s%>:0@MB        CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB  CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB  CplPAgrG1Cont;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB     CplPAgrG1Cont;

LEXICON CplPAgrG1Cont
                        ENDLEX;
                        PAgrCplCond2;


LEXICON CplPAgrG2
%<1s%>:m@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<2s%>:n@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<3s%>:0@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<1p%>:k@MB         CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<2p%>:n^Iz@MB      CplPAgrG2Cont;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      CplPAgrG2Cont;

LEXICON CplPAgrG2Cont
                        ENDLEX;
                        PAgrCplCond2;

! here if we have a person agreement already, happens after -DI, -sA
! and with -lAr after other TAM markers or nouns.
! 

LEXICON PAgrCplAll
                PAgrCplEvid;
                PAgrCplPast;
                PAgrCplCond;

LEXICON PAgrCplEvid
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     PAgrCplEvidCont;

LEXICON PAgrCplEvidCont
                            ENDLEX;
                            PAgrCplCond2;

LEXICON PAgrCplPast
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      PAgrCplPastCont;

LEXICON PAgrCplPastCont
                            PAgrCplCond2;
                            ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrCplCond
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       PAgrCplCondCont;

LEXICON PAgrCplCondCont
                            ENDLEX;
                             PAgrCplEvid2;
                             PAgrCplPast2;

LEXICON PAgrCplEvid2
%<cpl%:evid%>:^(y)m^NS^Iş@MB     ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrCplPast2
%<cpl%:past%>:^(y)^D^NS^I@MB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON PAgrCplCond2
%<cpl%:cond%>:^(y)s^NS^A@MB       ENDLEX;


!
! -(y)ken makes adverbials (converb?). However it  attaches where copular 
! markers typically attach, except it does not combine with person 
! agreement markers.
!

LEXICON lArCplKen
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      CplKen;

LEXICON CplKen
%<cv%:ken%>%<Adv%>:^(y)k^NSen@MB  AdvTimeCont; 

!
! Subordinating suffixes
!
!

LEXICON SubSuffixes
VerbalNoun;
Participle;
ConVerb;

LEXICON VerbalNoun
%<vn%:infmA%>%<N%>:m^A@MB            VNMaCont;
%<vn%:infmAK%>%<N%>:m^A^K@MB         VNMakCont;
%<vn%:past%>%<N%>:^D^I^k@MB          Ncont;
%<vn%:fut%>%<N%>:^(y)^Ac^A^k@MB      Ncont;
%<vn%:pres%>%<N%>:^(y)^An@MB         Ncont;
%<vn%:yis%>%<N%>:^(y)^Iş@MB          Ncont;     !TODO: a better tag name
%<vn%:esi%>%<N%>:^(y)^As^I@MB        Ncont;     !TODO: a better tag name

LEXICON VNMaCont
    NcompCont; ! includes final
    D_lI;
    ND_lIk;
    Deriv_MACA;
    D_CI;
    D_CIl; ! not likely
    D_sAl; ! not likely
#if (MARK_NCOMP == 1) 
    NcompInfl;
#endif

LEXICON VNMakCont
                              ENDLEX;
                              NCaseNoGen;
                              NomPredicateMAK;

LEXICON Participle
%<part%:past%>%<Adj%>:^D^I^k@MB         PartCont;
%<part%:fut%>%<Adj%>:^(y)^Ac^A^k@MB     PartCont;
%<part%:pres%>%<Adj%>:^(y)^An@MB        PartCont;
%<part%:esi%>%<Adj%>:^(y)^As^I@MB       ENDLEX;  !TODO: a better tag name

LEXICON PartCont
                   ENDLEX;
                   Ncont;
!                   AdjCont;

! TODO: this part needs rework. The list below roughly follows
!       G&K and the SFST version.
!
LEXICON ConVerb

%<cv%:ip%>:^(y)^Ip@MB                       DerivACont;
%<cv%:meksizin%>:m^Aks^NS^Iz^In@MB             DerivACont;
%<cv%:ince%>:^(y)^Inc^A@MB                  DerivACont;
%<cv%:erek%>:^(y)^Ar^NS^Ak@MB                  DerivACont;
%<cv%:eli%>:^(y)^Al^I@MB                    DerivACont;
%<cv%:dikce%>:^D^Ik^C^A@MB                  DerivACont;
%<cv%:esiye%>:^(y)^As^Iy^A@MB               DerivACont;
%<cv%:ye%>:^(y)^A@MB                        DerivACont;
%<cv%:mesine%>:m^As^In^A@MB                 DerivACont;

LEXICON CVNeg
%<cv%:den%>:d^An@MB             DerivACont;
%<cv%:den%:z%>:zd^An@MB         DerivACont; ! this is informal

LEXICON CVcesine
%<cv%:cesine%>:^C^As^In^A@MB     DerivACont;

LEXICON CVcesinePagr
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB  CVcesine;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB     CVcesine;
%<3s%>:0@MB        CVcesine;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB  CVcesine;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB  CVcesine;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB     CVcesine;


!
! The following defines behaviour of a small set of special words
! (mostly clitics). These are defined in clitics.lexc
!

! üzer (somewhat) is like `üst', but does not 
! occur in bare form. Below, we (currently) allow 
! it to form postpositional phrases just like üst/alt etc. 
! However, we do not allow it to function as adjectives.
!
!
! TODO: check whether this is too restrictive or not. 
!
LEXICON   uzerCont 
            uzerN;
            PostPlocation;

LEXICON uzerN
%<N%>:@RB     uzerNcont; 

LEXICON uzerNcont
                            Nplu;
                            Npos;
                            Ncase;
                            Nderiv;
#if (MARK_NCOMP == 1)
                            NcompInfl;
#endif


LEXICON var
%<Exist%>:@RB Ncont;

LEXICON yok
%<Exist%:neg%>:@RB Ncont;

LEXICON degil
%<Not%>:@RB Ncont;

!LEXICON VYDCont
!            VYDPAgr;
!            VYDDir;
!            CplAll;
!
!LEXICON VYDPAgr
!%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB       VYDPAgrCont;
!%<2s%>:s^In@MB          VYDPAgrCont;
!%<3s%>:0@MB             VYDPAgrCont;
!%<3p%:%0%>:0@MB             VYDPAgrCont;
!%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB       VYDPAgrCont;
!%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB       VYDPAgrCont;
!%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB          VYDPAgrCont;
!
!LEXICON VYDDir
!%<dir%>:^D^Ir@MB    VYDPAgrp3;
!
!LEXICON VYDPAgrCont
!                    ENDLEX;
!%<dir%>:^D^Ir@MB    ENDLEX;
!
!LEXICON  VYDPAgrp3
!%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB   ENDLEX;

!
! Punctuation
!

LEXICON  Punc
%<Punc%>:0     ENDLEX;

!
! non-puctuation symbols
!

LEXICON  Sym
%<Sym%>:0     ENDLEX;

!
! Derivational process.
!
! We include only a select set of relatively productive derivational
! morphemes here. However, the description below is still rather liberal. 
! Most derivational
! suffixes are either not very productive, or restrictive in their use more
! than prescribed with the rules below.
!
! The first part organizes the entry point to the classes of
! derivational suffixes. Then we describe the actual suffixes. And
! later how they continue. Entry/exit parts are rather redundant,
! However, it helps if certain restrictions (for example, not allowing
! indefinite number of derivations.
! 
!
! TODO: better handling of derivations. 
!

LEXICON Mderiv
        MN_zero;
        ND_lIk;

LEXICON Nderiv
            D_lI;
!            D_sIz; ! sIz can combine after most of the inflectional suffixes
            ND_lIk;
            Dimin;
            ND_CA;
            D_CI;
            D_CIl;
#if (ANALYZE_lA == 1)
            D_lA;
#endif
            ND_lAn;
            ND_lAS;
            D_sAl;
            D_imsi;
            D_si;
            D_mtrak;
!            D_gil; ! this works only in special cases.
!            D_inc;  ! ilgi-nç - any other?
!            D_al;
!            D_ik;
!            D_em;

LEXICON Pderiv
            D_lI;
            D_sIz;
            ND_lIk;
            PD_CA;
            D_CI;
            D_CIl;
            ND_lAS;

LEXICON Jderiv
            JD_lIk;
            D_lI;
            D_CI;
            D_sAl;
#if (ANALYZE_lA == 1)
            D_lA;
#endif
            JD_CA;
            JD_lAn;
            JD_lAS;
            JN_zero;
            JP_poss;
            D_imsi;
            D_mtrak;

LEXICON Aderiv
            D_sIz;
            AD_lIk;
            AD_CA;
            AN_zero;
!            AJ_zero;

LEXICON Vderiv
            D_yIcI;
            D_yIS;
            D_yAsI;
            D_Ik;

LEXICON D_Ik
%<ik%>:^I^k@MB       DerivJCont;

LEXICON Oderiv
            D_lA;
